Massachusetts, session 194th, S2628.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding sections 11 and 11A of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the town of
Bolton may, subject to section 12 of said chapter 138, provide for the issuance of licenses for the
sale of alcoholic beverages in the town of Bolton pursuant to said chapter 138. Licenses issued
pursuant to this act, and the issuance thereof shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except
said sections 11 and 11A.
of 1